apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="prov/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/ink__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ink</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ink</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inks</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inking</l>
          <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wr/ite__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ites</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ote</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itten</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ing__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ings</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/eek__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eek</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eek</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeks</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeking</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeking</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeking</l>
          <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sh/ear__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ears</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eared</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eared</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>orn</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sho/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="think"><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="think so"><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>so</l><r><g><b/>so</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="think that"><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>that</l><r><g><b/>that</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="write"><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="write about"><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>about</l><r><j/>about<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	<e lm="seek protection" a="eleka"><i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>protection</l><r><g><b/>protection</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="prove"><i>prov</i><par n="prov/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sing"><i>s</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="seek"><i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shoe"><i>sho</i><par n="sho/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sling"><i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="spring"><i>spr</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="think"><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="think so"><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>so</l><r><g><b/>so</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="think that"><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>that</l><r><g><b/>that</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="write"><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="write about"><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>about</l><r><j/>about<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    <e lm="rewrite"><i>rewr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="sling"><i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="smite" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>sm</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
